Utah statutes.
26-10-1.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Maternal and child health services" means:
(a)  the provision of educational, preventative, diagnostic, and treatment
services, including medical care, hospitalization, and other institutional
care and aftercare, appliances, and facilitating services directed toward
reducing infant mortality and improving the health of mothers and children
provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed to allow
any agency of the state to interfere with the rights of the parent of an
unmarried minor in decisions about the providing of health information or
services;
(b)  the development, strengthening, and improvement of standards and
techniques relating to the services and care;
(c)  the training of personnel engaged in the provision, development,
strengthening, or improvement of the services and care; and
(d)  necessary administrative services connected with Subsections (1)(a), (b),
and (c).
(2)  "Crippled children's services" means:
(a)  the early location of crippled children, provided that any program of
prenatal diagnosis for the purpose of detecting the possible disease or
disabilities of an unborn child will not be used for screening, but rather
will be utilized only when there are medical or genetic indications that
warrant diagnosis;
(b)  the provision for such  children of preventive, diagnosis, and treatment
services, including medical care, hospitalization, and other institutional
care and aftercare, appliances, and facilitating services directed toward the
diagnosis of the condition of such  children or toward the restoration of the
children to maximum physical and mental health;
(c)  the development, strengthening, and improvement of standards and
techniques relating to such  services and care;
(d)  the training of personnel engaged in the provision, development,
strengthening, or improvement of such  services and care; and
(e)  necessary administrative services connected with Subsections (2)(a), (b),
and (c).
